Idaho, session 2025, H0284.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-3506, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-3506. GOVERNOR TO TRANSMIT BUDGET DOCUMENT. Not later than five (5)
days following the convening of each regular legislative session On or be-
fore December 1, the governor shall transmit to the legislature a budget doc-
ument setting forth his financial plan for the next fiscal year, and having
the character and scope set forth. The budget document shall consist of four
(4) parts, the nature and contents of which are set forth in section 67-3507,
Idaho Code. The requests of the legislative and judicial departments shall
be transmitted as submitted by those departments.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.